Washington statutes.
RCW 18.39.270

Prearrangement contracts—Registration qualifications.

To qualify for and hold a certificate of registration, a funeral establishment must:

(1) Be licensed pursuant to this chapter; and

(2) Fully comply with and qualify according to the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1982 c 66 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—Transfer of records, files, and pending business—Savings—1982 c 66: See notes following RCW 18.39.240.